Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1940
Tax foreclosure proceedings; defects subsequent to decree of foreclosure; notice of hearing; service.

Notice of hearing upon the application shall be given to the plaintiff in the foreclosure proceedings, the state and all governmental subdivisions having any interest in the taxes found due by the decree, and all other persons who have since the entry of the decree apparently acquired any interest of record in the property. Such notice shall be served upon the parties in the same manner as a summons is served at the beginning of a civil action. Service of process may be made upon the State of Nebraska by service upon the Attorney General. Such parties shall have twenty days from the date of service of such notice in which to answer said application.

Laws 1949, c. 240, § 3, p. 653.